Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin MISSISSIPPI RIVER LEARNING CENTER; ST. PAUL.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $10,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Metropolitan Council for a grant to the city of St. Paul to construct, furnish, and equip marina buildings and surrounding site improvements at the Crosby Farm Regional Park in St. Paul to advance the Mississippi River Learning Center project, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.695. The project includes site preparation, trails and vehicular access, and marina amenities. This appropriation is in addition to the appropriation in Laws 2023, chapter 72, article 1, section 17, subdivision 5. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $10,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end